Missouri, session 2026, SB1103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 455, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 455.098, to read as
follows:
455.098. 1. Upon the request of the victim or the
prosecuting or circuit attorney, a court shall have
jurisdiction at the time of sentencing to enter a lifetime
protection order restraining or enjoining the defendant from
contacting the victim if the defendant has been found guilty
of a dangerous felony, as defined in section 556.061. The
protection order shall be effective immediately and shall be
served on the defendant at the time of sentencing. An order
issued pursuant to this section shall not expire and is
valid for the defendant's lifetime unless:
(1) The defendant makes a showing to the court that
the victim has died or the conviction has been dismissed,
expunged, or overturned or the defendant has been pardoned;
or
(2) The victim submits a written request to the court
for an early expiration upon which the court may hold a
hearing to terminate the order.

SB 1103 2
2. A copy of any order of protection granted pursuant
to this section shall be issued to the victim and to the
local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the
victim resides. The court shall provide all necessary
information, including the defendant's relationship to the
victim, for entry of the order of protection into the
Missouri Uniform Law Enforcement System (MULES) and the
National Crime Information Center (NCIC). Upon receiving
the order under this subsection, the sheriff shall make the
entry into MULES within twenty-four hours. MULES shall
forward the order information to NCIC, which will in turn
make the order viewable within the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). The sheriff shall enter
information contained in the order, including, but not
limited to, any orders regarding child custody or visitation
and all specifics as to times and dates of custody or
visitation that are provided in the order. A notice of
termination of any order of protection or any change in
child custody or visitation within that order shall be
issued to the local law enforcement agency for entry into
MULES or any other comparable law enforcement system. The
information contained in an order of protection may be
entered into MULES or any other comparable law enforcement
system using a direct automated data transfer from the court
automated system to the law enforcement system.
✓